Utah statutes.
77-24a-3.   Statement of finder.
A person finding unclaimed property and delivering it to a local law
enforcement agency shall sign a statement included in a form provided by the
agency, stating how the property came into his possession, including the time,
date, and place, and stating that he does not know who the owner of the
property is, that the property was not to his knowledge stolen, that his
possession of it is not unlawful, and providing any information he is aware of
which could lead to a determination of the owner.  Other information may be
requested by the agency receiving the item, as necessary.
